Utah statutes.
75-2-502.   Execution -- Witnessed wills -- Holographic wills.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2) and in Sections 75-2-503, 75-2-506,
and 75-2-513, a will shall be:
(a)  in writing;
(b)  signed by the testator or in the testator's name by some other individual
in the testator's conscious presence and by the testator's direction;  and
(c)  signed by at least two individuals, each of whom signed within a
reasonable time after he witnessed either the signing of the will as described
in Subsection (1)(b) or the testator's acknowledgment of that signature or
acknowledgment of the will.
(2)  A will that does not comply with Subsection (1) is valid as a holographic
will, whether or not witnessed, if the signature and material portions of the
document are in the testator's handwriting.
(3)  Intent that the document constitutes the testator's will can be
established by extrinsic evidence, including, for holographic wills, portions
of the document that are not in the testator's handwriting.
